California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
The treasurer shall pay out district funds only upon warrants of the commission, signed by the president and attested by the secretary, except that all bonds and coupons shall be paid on presentation by the county treasurer out of the bond fund without warrant.

Upon request of the commission or its secretary, the treasurer shall report in writing to the commission the amount of money in the various funds, the amount of receipts since his last report and the amounts paid out.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13.5. Claims [26225. - 26225.]

26225.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. Transfer of District Boulevards [26230. - 26230.]

26230.

After any boulevard has been completely constructed the commission may, at its option, convey all the right, title and interest of the district in and to that boulevard to the county within which the district is situated, if the board of supervisors of the county consents to and accepts the conveyance and agrees to maintain the boulevard as a boulevard and as part of the county highway system. All boulevards so conveyed shall be held by the county as county boulevards without any further liability or responsibility on the part of the district. No such conveyance shall affect the liability of the district for, or any bonds previously issued by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15. Dissolution [26240. - 26242.]

26240.

Whenever it shall deem it advisable, the commission shall, by resolution, order that an election be held in the district upon the question of dissolution of the district. The election shall be called and conducted in the same manner as other elections of the district, and if two-thirds of the electors of the district vote in favor of dissolution, the district shall be dissolved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26241.

Upon dissolution, any property in unincorporated territory which may have been acquired by the district shall vest in the county, and any property within the boundaries of an incorporated city shall vest in the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26242.

If at the time of the election to dissolve the district there is outstanding any bonded indebtedness of the district, the vote to dissolve shall dissolve the district for all purposes except the levy and collection of taxes for the payment of that outstanding indebtedness.

From the time of dissolution until the bonded indebtedness together with the interest thereon is fully paid, the board of supervisors of the county shall constitute ex officio the boulevard commission of the district, and shall levy such taxes and perform such other acts as may be necessary to raise money for the payment of the outstanding indebtedness of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 16. Validating Proceedings [26260. - 26260.]

26260.

An action to determine the legality of the existence of a district may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1527.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. BRIDGE AND HIGHWAY DISTRICTS [27000. - 27567.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [27000. - 27007.]

27000.

This part may be cited as the Bridge and Highway District Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27001.

As used in this part “district” means a bridge and highway district unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 605.)
-------------------------------------------

27002.

As used in this part “board” means the board of directors of the district unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 605.)
-------------------------------------------

27003.

As used in this part, “contiguous counties” include those counties separated by any of the waters of this State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 605.)
-------------------------------------------

27004.

As used in this part, “tolls” include tolls, charges, rentals, rates, traffic charges, and other income and revenue actually received or receivable by, or for the account of, the district for the use and operation of equipment, rolling stocks, ferries, properties, and facilities for travel that are constructed, owned, operated, or maintained by the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1694.)
-------------------------------------------

27005.

In any county having a registrar of voters, the powers conferred and the duties imposed by this part upon the county clerk in relation to matters of election and polling places, shall be exercised and performed by the registrar of voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27006.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, all elections held by the district shall be conducted as nearly as practicable in accordance with the general election laws of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27007.

No irregularity or informality in conducting any district election which has been otherwise fairly conducted shall invalidate or affect the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Ordinance of Intention [27020. - 27026.]

27020.

A bridge and highway district may be organized and incorporated in accordance with this part. When so incorporated it shall be entitled to exercise the powers expressly or impliedly conferred upon it by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27021.

A district may consist of part or all of one or more contiguous counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27022.

Proceedings for the incorporation of a district may be instituted by the adoption of an ordinance by the board of supervisors of each county desiring to form a district or by the electors of each such county under the provisions of law applicable to passage of ordinances by initiative declaring that the county, or part of the county, intends to unite with such other counties as may adopt like ordinances to form the district.

The ordinance need not name the counties to be included in the district, and a general statement in the ordinance that the county adopting it intends to unite with any other counties which may adopt like ordinances to form the district, shall be sufficient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27023.

The ordinance of intention shall provide that a petition for the formation of the district be circulated, and the board of supervisors shall, by resolution name and appoint persons to circulate and secure signatures for the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27024.

The ordinance of intention may also contain a distinctive corporate name for the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27025.

The ordinance of intention may be adopted by the board of supervisors at any time after application shall be made to it for that purpose. If the board of supervisors neglects to act upon the application for the adoption of the ordinance for a period of 60 days after it is submitted to it, the ordinance may be submitted to the electors of the county under the provisions of the initiative applicable to ordinances generally in the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27026.

If the ordinance is adopted by the board of supervisors, it shall be subject to the referendum provisions applicable to ordinances generally in the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Proceeding by Petition [27040. - 27048.]

27040.

The petition for the formation of the district shall give the name of the district, which shall be the legal name under which the district shall be known, and shall set forth the extent of the proposed district, either by describing its exterior boundaries, or by naming the counties proposed to be included in it and shall contain a prayer that the proposed district be incorporated under the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27041.

If only part of any county is proposed to be included in the district, the extent of the part of the county included may be indicated by naming the county and excepting therefrom some administrative or governmental subdivisions thereof, such as townships, school districts or other similar subdivisions, or the excluded portion may be described by its boundaries. In any description of included or excluded territory, reference to recorded instruments may be made for the purpose of defining boundaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27042.

Attached to each copy of the petition shall be a copy of the ordinance providing for its circulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27043.

The petition circulated in each county may consist of any number of separate copies of the original instrument and shall be signed by voters residing within the boundaries of the county or portion of the county proposed to be included in the district equal in number to at least 10 per cent of the number of voters in the county or portion thereof from which the petition is presented who voted for Governor of this State at the last general election at which a Governor was elected prior to the presentation of the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27044.

The copies of the petition from each county shall be grouped or fastened together and submitted to the county elections official of that county for examination and verification. The county elections official shall have 30 days’ time for the examination of the copies of the petition left with him or her for verification. Within that period of time he or she shall verify each of the signatures on the copies of the petition left with him or her, attach thereto his or her certificate that the copies of the petition have been signed by the requisite number of registered voters and forward the copies of the petition with his or her certificate attached to the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 136.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

27045.

If the county elections official finds that the copies of the petition are not signed by the requisite number of registered voters residing within the county he or she shall certify to the number of registered voters required to make the petition sufficient. Within 20 days from the date of that certificate, copies of the petition containing additional signatures secured either by the same persons theretofore appointed to secure signatures or by other persons appointed by the board of supervisors for that purpose may be filed with the county elections official.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 137.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

27046.

The county elections official shall within 30 days after the filing of the supplemental copies of the petition examine and verify each of the signatures thereon and certify to the result of the examination as he or she did in connection with the original copies of the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 138.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

27047.

If the petition as supplemented contains a sufficient number of signatures the county elections official shall present it with the certificate to that effect attached to the Secretary of State without delay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 139.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

27048.

If the certificate of the county elections official shows that any petition as originally filed or as supplemented is insufficient he or she shall so certify and the petition with the certificate attached shall be filed with the Secretary of State and kept by the Secretary of State as a public record, without prejudice however, to the filing of a new petition to the same effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 140.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Proceeding by Election [27060. - 27063.]

27060.

The board of supervisors of any county may, instead of proceeding by petition, call a special election for the purpose of submitting the question of the inclusion of the county, or that part of the county which is proposed to be included, in the district, to the electors of the county, or to the electors of that portion of the county proposed to be included in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27061.

If a majority of the registered voters voting at the election vote in favor of including the county or a specified part thereof in the district, the county or the part thereof approved for inclusion in the district, shall be included therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27062.

The election shall be called and held in accordance with the Uniform District Election Law (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 141.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

27063.

The county elections official shall certify the results of the election to the Secretary of State together with a copy of the action of the board of supervisors calling the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 142.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Exclusion of Counties Proposed for Inclusion in the District [27080. - 27083.]

27080.

If, within 120 days after application is made to it the board of supervisors of any county named in the petitions from other counties engaged in the formation of the district fails to adopt an ordinance of intention to unite with the other counties in the formation of the district, and no proceedings for the adoption of an ordinance under the provisions of law relating to the initiative are on file with the county elections official, the county elections official shall upon receipt of an affidavit of an elector of the county, setting forth: (a) The date the original application was made to the board of supervisors and (b) the failure of that body to act thereon for 60 days thereafter, issue a certificate to the Secretary of State certifying that on the date of the issuing thereof no proceedings have been filed in his or her office to submit an ordinance to the electors under the provisions applicable to the initiative. The county elections official shall immediately transmit the certificate and affidavit to the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 143.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

27081.

The Secretary of State shall file the affidavit with the certificate attached and he shall exclude the county from which the affidavit and certificate have been received from the proposed district in the same manner as if the county had been excluded by order of the superior court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27082.

If an ordinance declaring it to be the intention of a county to become part of the district has been submitted to the people and has failed to be adopted, that fact shall be certified to the Secretary of State by the county elections official, and that county shall be excluded from the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 144.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

27083.

If a county which is excluded because no ordinance of intention is adopted by it, separates another county, from which sufficient petitions have been received to become a part of the district, from the remainder of the counties of the proposed district, the county thus separated shall not be excluded from the district but shall be included therein even though it is not contiguous to the other counties composing the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Incorporation of the District [27100. - 27113.]

27100.

When all of the petitions, or certifications of the result of elections have been received from the county elections officials of the counties having any portion of their territory within the boundaries of the proposed district the Secretary of State shall publish the text of the petition, together with a notice fixing the time within which protests against the inclusion of property within the proposed district may be filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 145.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

27101.

The petition and notice shall be published for at least three weeks prior to the last day in which protests may be filed in at least one and not to exceed three newspapers printed and published in each of the counties from which petitions have been presented.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27102.

Neither the names attached to the petition, nor the certificates of any of the county elections officials, need be published with the petition. It shall be sufficient to state that the petition has been signed by a certain number of electors, naming it, and duly verified by the county elections official of the county in which the petition was circulated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 146.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

27103.

Any owner of property which is subject to taxation within the boundaries of the proposed district may, within the time specified, protest against the formation of the district.

The protest shall be in writing and shall be filed with the Secretary of State. The protest shall contain:

(a) The name and address of the person protesting and the name and address of his attorney, if he has one.

(b) The grounds upon which the protestant claims that his property will not be benefited by the formation of the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27104.

The Secretary of State shall attach the protests which he receives from each county to the petition filed from that particular county, and forward the petition with the protests attached to the superior court of that county. The superior court in each county shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine the protests so received. The clerk of the court shall set the protests for hearing, and give notice thereof in writing to the protestants, and to their attorneys if they have any, at least 10 days before the date set for the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27105.

At the time specified in the notice, or at such other time to which the said hearing may be continued, the superior court shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine all matters urged by the protestants against the formation of the proposed district, or against the inclusion of their lands therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27106.

The superior court shall have jurisdiction to exclude any lands from the proposed district, together with any other lands contiguous to the excluded lands, and contiguous to the exterior boundaries of the proposed district which are similarly situated to the lands of the protestants, to the end that isolated tracts may not be excluded from the district without also rectifying the boundaries thereof so that the district when finally formed shall be compact, continuous and without tracts of land excluded therefrom which are totally surrounded by other lands which are left within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27107.

The judgment of the superior court shall not be appealable, and all questions of fact therein contained shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27108.

The judgment shall only be subject to review by the Supreme Court of this State, upon a writ of review issued out of that court in such cases as writs of review are now permissible against superior courts.

Proceedings for a writ of review may only be taken within 10 days after the entry of the judgment in the superior court and if not so taken all such judgments of the superior court shall become final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27109.

After the judgment of the court has become final the county elections official shall certify the judgment together with the petition and the protests which he or she received, to the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 147.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

27110.

When the results of the final judgments upon all protests have been certified to the Secretary of State, he shall issue his certificate of incorporation declaring the district with the boundaries as finally established to be duly incorporated. He shall file the original certificate of incorporation in his office, and have a certified copy of the certificate recorded in the office of the county recorder of each of the counties having any territory within the boundaries of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27111.

Upon the issuance of the certificate of incorporation the district shall come into existence and shall have all the rights, powers and privileges expressly or impliedly conferred upon it by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27112.

After the Secretary of State has issued his certificate of incorporation of the district, the sufficiency of any petition shall not be subject to judicial review or be otherwise questioned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27113.

No informality in any proceeding not substantially affecting adversely the legal rights of any person shall invalidate the incorporation of any district.

All proceedings to contest the validity of the incorporation of any district may only be commenced within three months from the date of the issuance of the certificate of incorporation. If no such proceedings are commenced within the time allowed, the incorporation of the district, and all proceedings in connection therewith, shall be valid and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Appointment and Tenure of the Board of Directors [27120. - 27125.]

27120.

Within five days after the issuance of the certificate of incorporation, the Secretary of State shall notify the boards of supervisors of each of the counties in which any portion of the territory of the district is located, of the incorporation of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27121.

Within 30 days after the receipt of the notice of incorporation of the district each of the boards of supervisors so notified shall appoint the persons to represent the county on the board of directors of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27123.

Those directors appointed by the board of supervisors of a county shall be appointed by resolution of the board of supervisors, and a copy of the resolution shall be filed with the clerk of the board of supervisors, and a certified copy of the resolution shall be immediately forwarded to the Department of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 148.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

27124.

All directors shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority; provided, that notwithstanding this section and Section 27122, any director in office on the effective date of this section may continue to serve on the board until the expiration of the term for which he was appointed.

Each appointing authority shall review its appointment or appointments to the board in January every two years, and indicate its desire to retain such director or directors by affirming such retention by the adoption of a resolution, or, in the case of the Mayor of the City and County of San Francisco, by the issuance of a declaration, to that effect.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1472.)
-------------------------------------------

27125.

Any vacancy in the board shall be filled by appointment by the appointing authority which originally appointed the director whose position has become vacant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1472.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Organization and Powers of the Board and the Executive Officers [27140. - 27154.]

27140.

The board shall be the governing body of the district and shall outline rules of policy, approve plans, and vote or withhold appropriations to carry the same into effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27141.

Within two weeks after the Secretary of State has received certified copies of the resolutions of the board of supervisors of each county in the district, appointing the members of the board of directors from that county, he shall call the first meeting of the board of directors and shall designate an appropriate time, which shall be within that two week period, and place at which the meeting shall be held.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27142.

At the first meeting the board shall organize by choosing one of its members as president, and choosing a secretary, who shall not be a member of the board. At its first meeting the board shall also provide for the time and place of holding its meetings, and the manner in which its special meetings may be called.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27143.

All meetings of the board, whether regular or special, shall be open to the public. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27144.

The board shall adopt rules to govern its proceedings, including the use of motions in connection with such proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1381.)
-------------------------------------------

27145.

The board shall select an office and place of business within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27146.

For the purpose of considering questions relating to the bridge and highway district generally or local questions affecting a particular county or group of counties, the board or any of its committees may hold meetings in the chambers of the boards of supervisors of any county in the group, if suitable for that purpose, or at any other suitable place which the board or any of its committees may designate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 440.)
-------------------------------------------

27147.

All official action of the board shall be by ordinance or resolution.

The ayes and noes shall be taken upon the passage of all ordinances and resolutions, and entered upon the journal of the proceedings of the board. No ordinance or resolution shall be passed or become effective without the affirmative votes of at least a majority of the members of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27148.

The enacting clause of all ordinances passed by the board shall be “Be it ordained by the board of directors of ____ bridge and highway district as follows:” All resolutions and ordinances shall be signed by the president of the board and attested by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27149.

Each member of the board shall receive the sum of fifty dollars ($50) for attending each meeting of the board and each committee meeting on different days, but no member shall receive this compensation in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) in any one year, except the president who shall not receive this compensation in excess of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) in any one year. Each member of the board shall receive a sum equal to the necessary traveling expenses incurred by him or her in the performance of board duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 593, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

27150.

The board shall at its first meeting, or as soon thereafter as practicable, appoint by a majority vote a general manager, an auditor and a secretary. No director shall be eligible for appointment to any district office except president or vice president of the board. The compensation of the general manager, auditor, and secretary shall be fixed by the board, and such officers shall serve during the pleasure of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27151.

The general manager shall be the executive officer of the district. He shall employ and discharge at pleasure all subordinate officers, employees and assistants, prescribe their duties, and subject to the approval of the board, he shall fix their compensation. He shall have full charge and control of the construction, maintenance and operation of all works of the district. The general manager shall report to the board in accordance with such rules and regulations as the board may adopt.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27152.

The board shall appoint an attorney and all subordinate officers not provided to be appointed by the general manager, and shall fix their salaries. Subordinate officers appointed by the board shall serve at its pleasure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27153.

The board may change the name of the district by resolution, which shall become effective upon the filing of a certified copy of the resolution with the Secretary of State and with the clerk of the board of supervisors of each county included in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27154.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, or any limitation or restriction contained in any law, the board may:

(a) Invest and reinvest all or any part of lapsed, unallocated, unappropriated or other surplus moneys belonging to any fund of which the board has custody or control in bonds and other obligations for which the faith and credit of the United States of America are pledged or in any obligation, bond or security approved by the Commissioner of Financial Institutions as legal for investment by savings banks. All such investments heretofore made are legalized.

(b) Use all or any part of lapsed, unallocated, unappropriated or other surplus or reserve moneys of the district for the refunding or partial refunding or purchase of any existing bonded indebtedness against the district.

The interest or income from any funds invested under this section may be made a part of the fund from which the investment was made and may itself be so invested.

Any investment previously made in bonds and other obligations for which the faith and credit of the United States of America are pledged or in any obligation, bond or security which under the Financial Code is legal for investment by savings banks is hereby validated and made legal investments for the purposes of this section, whether such bonds or obligations are negotiable or not.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 808.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997, by Sec. 814 of Ch. 1064.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. District Powers [27160. - 27179.]

27160.

The district shall have perpetual succession and acting through the board shall have the powers prescribed in this chapter in addition to any others expressly conferred on it by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27161.

The district may sue and be sued in its corporate name in all actions and proceedings in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27162.

The district may adopt a seal and alter it at pleasure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27163.

The district may take by grant, purchase, gift, devise, or lease, or otherwise acquire, and hold, use, and enjoy, real and personal property of every kind within or without the district necessary for the full or convenient exercise of its powers. The board may lease, mortgage, sell, or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property within or without the district when, in its judgment, it is for the best interests of the district so to do.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 50, Sec. 2.   Effective March 22, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

27164.

The district may acquire, or contract to acquire, and may construct under contract, or by its own employees, maintain, improve, and operate bridges, abutments, rights-of-way, roads, tunnels, railroads, streetcar lines, interurban lines, telephone and telegraph lines, footpaths, viaducts, tollgates, tollhouses, subways, and all other forms of property necessary or proper for the successful prosecution of the project for which the district was organized, or which may be authorized by the board of directors of the district under its powers, including all machinery or other property useful or necessary to construct, maintain, operate, or otherwise make use of toll bridges and highways, and complete, add to, repair, or otherwise improve, any of the property acquired by it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 174.)
-------------------------------------------

27165.

The district may acquire by purchase, gift or condemnation, or lease from the United States, this State, or from any person, or public or private corporation, lands, rights of way, or rights in, over or across lands or waters which are necessary or proper for the construction or operation of bridges, and the approaches thereto, fix and collect tolls, for the purpose of meeting the obligations of the district and repaying the same, and dispose of the surplus to the various counties within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27166.

The district may exercise the right of eminent domain to take any property necessary to the exercise of the powers granted in this part, or in any provision of law, to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 582.)
-------------------------------------------

27167.

The district may borrow money, incur indebtedness and issue bonds or other evidences of such indebtedness; and refund or retire any indebtedness or lien that may exist against the district or any of its property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27168.

The district may purchase or condemn any works which might be constructed by the district, whether completed or partly completed, and conduct and manage the same.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27169.

The district may have taxes levied and collected in accordance with the provisions of this part for the purpose of paying running expenses, organization expenses and the investigation expenses of the district before the issuance of bonds, and for the purpose of paying the obligations of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27170.

The district may make contracts, employ labor, and all kinds of employees, whether skilled or unskilled, for the purpose of carrying on the business of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 175.)
-------------------------------------------

27171.

The district may establish all necessary rules, regulation or conditions under which the property of the district may be used by the public and fix and collect all tolls for the use thereof, and enter into contracts with any persons or public officers or public or private corporations, whereby the facilities constructed by the district may be made use of, by such persons, officers, or corporations, and at the tolls or for the consideration fixed by such contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27172.

The district may do all things necessary for the complete exercise of the powers described in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27173.

The work of constructing, repairing, relocating, or otherwise providing any of the highways or approaches composed of the structures or improvements mentioned in Part 3 (commencing with Section 27000) of Division 15 of this code or Article 60 (commencing with Section 20910) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, may be done by any district in cooperation with a city, county, joint highway district, or other district formed for the improvement or building of roads, or in cooperation with the state.
